Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.160.190

Student transportation allocation—Notice—Payment schedule.

The superintendent shall notify districts of their student transportation allocation before January 15th. The superintendent shall recalculate and prorate the district's allocation for the transportation of pupils to and from school.

The superintendent shall make the student transportation allocation in accordance with the apportionment payment schedule in RCW 28A.510.250. Such allocation payments may be based on the prior school year's ridership report for payments to be made in September, October, November, December, and January.

[ 2009 c 548 s 308; 1990 c 33 s 145; 1985 c 59 s 2; 1983 1st ex.s. c 61 s 6; 1982 1st ex.s. c 24 s 3; 1981 c 265 s 5. Formerly RCW 28A.41.525.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 548 ss 304-311: See note following RCW 28A.160.150.

Intent—2009 c 548: See RCW 28A.150.1981.

Finding—2009 c 548: See note following RCW 28A.410.270.

Intent—Finding—2009 c 548: See note following RCW 28A.305.130.

Severability—1983 1st ex.s. c 61: See note following RCW 28A.160.010.

Effective date—Severability—1982 1st ex.s. c 24: See notes following RCW 28A.160.180.

Effective date—Severability—1981 c 265: See notes following RCW 28A.160.150.